Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1487
Termination of landlord's interest in park; deposit; how treated.

Upon termination of a landlord's interest in a mobile home park, the landlord or his or her agent shall, within a reasonable time, (1) transfer the rental deposit, or any remainder after any lawful deductions, to the landlord's successor in interest and notify the tenant in writing of the transfer and of the transferee's name and address or (2) return the deposit, or any remainder after any lawful deductions, to the tenant. The notice shall state the amount of rental deposit being transferred or assumed and shall be given by mail or personal service.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 38.